District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

42-1730

Provisions applicable to nonresident brokers and salesmen

Repealed.

History

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-209, § 34, 30 DCR 390

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 45-1901 to 45-1918.